Nebraska, session 109, LB1032A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1032A LB1032A
2026 2026
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $1 from the General Fund
for FY2026-27 and (2) $-0- from the General Fund for FY2027-28 to the
Department of Health and Human Services, for Program 33, to aid in
carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 1032, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems
for state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this
section.
-2-